examples/sup_test.dix
<?xml version="1.0"?>
<dictionary>
<alphabet>12345abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZ-.</alphabet>

<sdefs>
<sdef n="vargaH:nA" c="Noun"/>
<sdef n="vargaH:sa-pU-pa" c="samAsa pUrva pada"/>
<sdef n="vargaH:sa-u-pa-puM" c="samAsa uwwara pada"/>
<sdef n="vargaH:sa-u-pa-napuM" c="samAsa uwwara pada"/>
<sdef n="vargaH:sa-u-pa-swrI" c="samAsa uwwara pada"/>

<sdef n="lifgam:puM" c="masculine"/>
<sdef n="lifgam:swrI" c="feminine"/>
<sdef n="lifgam:napuM" c="neuter"/>
<sdef n="lifgam:a" c="any"/>

<sdef n="vacanam:eka" c="singular"/>
<sdef n="vacanam:xvi" c="dual"/>
<sdef n="vacanam:bahu" c="plural"/>

<sdef n="viBakwiH:1" c="1"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:2" c="2"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:3" c="3"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:4" c="4"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:5" c="5"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:6" c="6"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:7" c="7"/>
<sdef n="viBakwiH:8" c="8"/>

<sdef n="level:0" c="0"/>
<sdef n="level:1" c="1"/>
<sdef n="level:2" c="2"/>
<sdef n="level:3" c="3"/>
<sdef n="level:4" c="4"/>

</sdefs>

<pardefs>
<pardef n="rAm/a__nm">
<e><p><l>aH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>O</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>am</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>O</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>An</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eNa</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AByAm</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>EH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aya</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AByAm</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eByaH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Aw</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Ax</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AByAm</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eByaH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>asya</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ayoH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANAm</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ayoH</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eRu</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="xev/a__spn">
<e><p><l>a</l> <r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:4"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>O</l> <r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:4"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AH</l> <r>a<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:puM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:4"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="sIw/A__spn">
<e><p><l>e</l> <r>A<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:4"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l> <r>A<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:4"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>AH</l> <r>A<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:swrI"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:4"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="jFAn/a__sn">
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:sa-u-pa-puM"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="level:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><i></i><par n="xev/a__spn"/></e>
<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="vargaH:sa-u-pa-swrI"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="level:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r></r></p><i></i><par n="sIw/A__spn"/></e>
</pardef>
</pardefs>

<section id="main" type="standard">
<e lm="rAma"><i>rAm</i><par n="rAm/a__nm"/></e>
<e lm="rAmaBaxra"><i>rAmaBaxr</i><par n="rAm/a__nm"/></e>
</section>

</dictionary>
